Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1818YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 218 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 1C.18 Triple Negative Breast Cancer 1 Action and Awareness Day. 2 The governor of this state is hereby authorized and 3 requested to issue annually a proclamation designating the 4 third day of March as Triple Negative Breast Cancer Action and 5 Awareness Day. 6